Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,240
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Economic Recovery Act:

(1) Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of Nebraska in which:

(a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in the state during the same period; and

(b) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more for the federal census tract in the area; and

(2) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2022.

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 47.